apertium-bn-en.bn.dix
    <pardef n="সি__n_nt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="nt" />
            <s n="nn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="nom" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলো</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="nt" />
            <s n="nn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="nom" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="nt" />
            <s n="nn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="nom" />
            <s n="def" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টি</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="nt" />
            <s n="nn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="nom" />
            <s n="def" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="nt" />
            <s n="nn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="obj" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলো</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="nt" />
            <s n="nn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="obj" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="nt" />
            <s n="nn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="obj" />
            <s n="def" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টি</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="nt" />
            <s n="nn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="obj" />
            <s n="def" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>র</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="nt" />
            <s n="nn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="gen" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোর</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="nt" />
            <s n="nn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="gen" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টার</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="nt" />
            <s n="nn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="gen" />
            <s n="def" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টির</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="nt" />
            <s n="nn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="gen" />
            <s n="def" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তে</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="nt" />
            <s n="nn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="loc" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোয়</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="nt" />
            <s n="nn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="loc" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টায়</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="nt" />
            <s n="nn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="loc" />
            <s n="def" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="গাভী__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="aa" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="nom" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলো</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="aa" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="nom" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="aa" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="nom" />
            <s n="def" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টি</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="aa" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="nom" />
            <s n="def" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="aa" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="obj" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোকে</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="aa" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="obj" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টাকে</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="aa" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="obj" />
            <s n="def" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টিকে</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="aa" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="obj" />
            <s n="def" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>র</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="aa" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="gen" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোর</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="aa" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="gen" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টার</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="aa" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="gen" />
            <s n="def" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টির</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="aa" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="gen" />
            <s n="def" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="কাঠি">
      <i>কাঠি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ঘাটতি">
      <i>ঘাটতি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="অগ্নি">
      <i>অগ্নি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="টুপি">
      <i>টুপি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="গাভী">
      <i>গাভী</i>
      <par n="গাভী__n_f" />
    </e>
    <e lm="রাত্রি">
      <i>রাত্রি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ফেব্রুয়ারি">
      <i>ফেব্রুয়ারি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="একাডেমি">
      <i>একাডেমি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="চুরি">
      <i>চুরি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="চাকরি">
      <i>চাকরি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="বৃষ্টি">
      <i>বৃষ্টি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="লিচু">
      <i>লিচু</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="রাশি">
      <i>রাশি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="জীবাণু">
      <i>জীবাণু</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="বিভ্রান্তি">
      <i>বিভ্রান্তি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="অশান্তি">
      <i>অশান্তি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="বালি">
      <i>বালি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="শ্রেণী">
      <i>শ্রেণী</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="সি">
      <i>সি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="বৃত্তি">
      <i>বৃত্তি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="মধু">
      <i>মধু</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ভিত্তি">
      <i>ভিত্তি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="রেণু">
      <i>রেণু</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="মাটি">
      <i>মাটি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="সোসাইটি">
      <i>সোসাইটি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="চেহারা">
      <i>চেহারা</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ইনজুরি">
      <i>ইনজুরি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="সমন্বয়কারী">
      <i>সমন্বয়কারী</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="পরিণতি">
      <i>পরিণতি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="নিষ্পত্তি">
      <i>নিষ্পত্তি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="কাণ্ড">
      <i>কাণ্ড</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="মহানগরী">
      <i>মহানগরী</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="পুঁজি">
      <i>পুঁজি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ভরি">
      <i>ভরি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ফাঁকি">
      <i>ফাঁকি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="মজুরি">
      <i>মজুরি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ভাগাভাগি">
      <i>ভাগাভাগি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="গণপূর্ত">
      <i>গণপূর্ত</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="উদ্ধৃতি">
      <i>উদ্ধৃতি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="তৈরী">
      <i>তৈরী</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="আদি">
      <i>আদি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="উইকি">
      <i>উইকি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="বায়ু">
      <i>বায়ু</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ফলশ্রুতি">
      <i>ফলশ্রুতি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="রেলওয়ে">
      <i>রেলওয়ে</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="আকাদেমি">
      <i>আকাদেমি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="কোম্পানী">
      <i>কোম্পানী</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="দ্রুতি">
      <i>দ্রুতি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="খনি">
      <i>খনি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="পৃষ্ঠ">
      <i>পৃষ্ঠ</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="সাময়িকী">
      <i>সাময়িকী</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="মেমরি">
      <i>মেমরি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="প্রণালী">
      <i>প্রণালী</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="অ্যাকাডেমি">
      <i>অ্যাকাডেমি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="সংগ্রহশালা">
      <i>সংগ্রহশালা</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ত্রয়ী">
      <i>ত্রয়ী</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="কলসী">
      <i>কলসী</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="পলি">
      <i>পলি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="পাণ্ডুলিপি">
      <i>পাণ্ডুলিপি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="সন্ধি">
      <i>সন্ধি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="চূড়া">
      <i>চূড়া</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="পুঁথি">
      <i>পুঁথি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="জনবসতি">
      <i>জনবসতি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
    <e lm="সারণি">
      <i>সারণি</i>
      <par n="সি__n_nt" />
    </e>
